Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
CHAPTER 5 Malt Beverages

Law reviews.

For note, “Beer, Liquor, or a Little Bit of Both? Getting to the Bottom of Properly Classifying Flavored Malt Beverages in the United States and Australia,” see 39 Ga. J. Int’l & Comp. L. 471 (2011).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Malt beverage regulations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Revenue, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax Unit, Chapter 560-2-7.